Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20188-191
Banks; possession by department; notice to banks and trust companies; notice or knowledge of possession forestalls liens.

Upon taking possession of the property and business of any bank, the department shall immediately give notice of such fact by letter or electronic mail to all banks or trust companies holding or in possession of any assets of such bank, so far as known by the department. No bank or trust company so notified or knowing of such possession by the department shall have a lien or charge for any payment, advance, or clearance thereafter made, or liability thereafter incurred, against any of the assets of the bank of whose property and business the department shall have taken possession unless the bank be continued as a going concern.

Laws 1923, c. 191, § 16, p. 445;

C.S.1929, § 8-187;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 49, p. 160;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-187;

R.S.1943, § 8-177;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 91, p. 170;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 88.

Act of Department of Banking in taking over insolvent bank is not subject to collateral attack. Torgeson v. Department of Trade and Commerce, 127 Neb. 38, 254 N.W. 735 (1934).

Notice of possession of bank by Department of Banking forestalls all future liens, unless the bank be continued as a going concern. Luikart v. Hunt, 124 Neb. 642, 247 N.W. 790 (1933).